California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
If the board consents to the annexation after any bonded debt of this district has been authorized, the board of supervisors so applying for annexation shall call an election at which the proposition to join the district and assume the obligation of the bonds of the district along with the territory already included therein, shall be submitted to the electors of the county or portion thereof as one proposition. Unless the proposition receives two-thirds of the votes cast at the election the county or part thereof shall not be annexed to the district. If the proposition carries by two-thirds or more of the votes cast at the election the result of the election shall be certified to the Secretary of State by the county elections official and thereupon the Secretary of State shall give notice and call for protests in the same manner as upon the original incorporation of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 296.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

27323.

If the district has not incurred a bonded indebtedness at the time of the application by the board of supervisors to join the district, the county or part thereof may be annexed if the board of supervisors passes an ordinance declaring its intention to join the district and upon petition presented in the manner provided in this part for the organization of the district. The petition shall be presented to the Secretary of State, who shall give notice of the presentation thereof, and of the date set for receiving protests against the annexation in the same manner as for original petitions, and all of the provisions of this part which are applicable to original petitions shall be applicable to petitions for annexations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27324.

After all protests have been disposed of in the same manner as protests upon the incorporation of the district, the Secretary of State shall issue his certificate certifying to the annexation and describing the boundaries of the district as finally determined, which certificate shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of each county wherein any portion of the annexed territory is located, and thereupon the boards of supervisors of the county shall appoint a member or members of the board to serve until the expiration of the term of the directors then holding for the term of office that will soonest expire.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27325.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of annexation by the Secretary of State the territory named therein shall become a part of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District [27500. - 27567.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [27500. - 27512.]

27500.

Unless the particular provision or the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

27501.

“District” means the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

27502.

“Golden Gate Bridge” means the bridge spanning the Golden Gate between the City and County of San Francisco and the County of Marin.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

27503.

“Transit services” means the transportation of passengers and their incidental baggage by the district by means other than sightseeing ferryboats.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

27510.

The composition of the board of directors of the district shall be as follows:

(a) One director, representing Del Norte County, one director, representing Mendocino County, and one director, representing Napa County, appointed by the board of supervisors of the respective represented county.

(b) Four directors, representing Marin County, appointed by the board of supervisors thereof. One of the directors shall be an elected member of the board of supervisors, another of the directors shall be an elected member of a city council of a city within Marin County, and shall be designated by the Marin Council of Mayors and Councilmen and another of the directors shall be a member of the general public.

(c) Three directors, representing Sonoma County, appointed by the board of supervisors thereof. One of the directors may be an elected member of the board of supervisors, and another of the directors shall be an elected member of a city council of a city within Sonoma County, and shall be designated by the Mayors’ and Councilmen’s Association of Sonoma County.

(d) Nine directors, representing the City and County of San Francisco, eight of whom shall be appointed by the board of supervisors thereof, and one of whom shall be appointed by the mayor thereof by an order of appointment, a certified copy of which shall be immediately forwarded to the Secretary of State. Four of the directors shall be elected members of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 27122 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 139.)
-------------------------------------------

27512.

(a) The adoption, terms, and conditions of a pension plan covering employees of the district in a bargaining unit represented by a labor organization shall be pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement between that organization and the board and shall be subject to this section.

(b) The pension plan and the funds of the plan shall be managed and administered by a retirement board composed of equal representation of labor and management. Any deadlock among the members of the board with respect to that management and administration shall be resolved in the manner specified in Section 302 of the federal Labor Management Relations Act, 1947 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 186(c)(5)).

(c) The duties and responsibilities of the retirement board shall be executed in accordance with Section 17 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(d) This section does not apply if the district has, pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement, provided membership for the district’s represented employees in the Public Employees’ Retirement System, a retirement system established pursuant to the County Employees Retirement Law of 1937, or a pension trust subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.)

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 845, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Planning [27530. - 27533.]

27530.

The Legislature finds and declares that since July 1, 1971, the district has been freed of bonded indebtedness. The prospective continuing role of the district and its responsibilities in the field of transportation are policy questions of major importance to the citizens of California, the people and communities regularly served by the Golden Gate Bridge, the district, and the Legislature.

It is desirable, therefore, that all concerned have a common basis for considering the issues and exercising judgment. To this end, the district is directed to develop a transportation facilities plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

27531.

The transportation facilities plan shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) A definition of the district’s future responsibilities for providing transportation services. Alternative proposals are encouraged. Abolishment of the district should be one alternative, in which case recommendations should be made for necessary transfer of powers and duties.

(b) A priority schedule for assuming each of any proposed added responsibilities.

(c) Necessary changes in the district’s organizational structure in order to be responsive to any changed responsibilities.

(d) An estimate of the expenditures that may be necessary to support any added responsibilities.

(e) A definition of any capital improvements that may be required.

(f) A long-range estimate of bridge revenues, operating costs, and net revenues that may be available as required to provide proposed transportation services. 

(g) A special element addressed to the interfacing of transportation modes.

(h) Explicit consideration must be given to the environmental and social values of the communities affected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

27532.

In developing the transportation facilities plan, the district shall hold public hearings so that interested persons and organizations are provided an opportunity to express their viewpoints.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

27533.

No long-range transportation plan of the district shall be adopted unless such plan is consistent with the regional transportation plan of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission and approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers and Functions [27550. - 27567.]

27550.

The district may study, construct, acquire, improve, maintain, and operate any and all modes of transportation within or partly outside the district, including, but not limited to, water transportation; may join with any cities, counties, districts, or state agencies, or any combinations thereof, to study and to provide any such mode of transportation as may be deemed by the board to be reasonable and appropriate to provide or to assist in providing transportation within or partly outside the district; and may pay for or finance, in whole or in part, any such study and any such mode of transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

27551.

The district may not, prior to December 30, 1975, expend any of its funds to implement the addition of a second deck to the Golden Gate Bridge or any other proposed plan for transit services, other than for its interim system of buses and ferries.

It is the intention of the Legislature that the district’s interim system of buses and ferries shall be the system outlined in the district’s grant application to the Urban Mass Transportation Administration, dated May 21, 1971, entitled, “Application of the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transporation District for a Mass Transportation Capital Grant under the Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964, as amended.”

The district, however, may expend the necessary funds for planning purposes, and for the acquisition of rights-of-way necessary, regardless of what type of transit system is proposed in the Golden Gate Corridor Transportation Facilities Plan submitted to the Legislature in April, 1971, and in the Golden Gate Corridor Transportation Facilities Plan—Phase II submitted to the Legislature in September, 1975.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

27552.

If the district constructs any rail transit lines, such lines, and the rolling stock and other facilities therefor, shall be coordinated with the system of the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District.

If the district constructs any tunnel within the Geary Corridor in the City and County of San Francisco, such tunnel and its underground stations shall be constructed so that the conversion of such facilities to physically accommodate the equipment used by the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District can be accomplished at a minimum cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

27553.

With respect to its ferryboat operations, the district shall not operate any charter or sightseeing services. However, the district may contract with any common carrier to provide such services and to employ the district’s boats, employees, facilities, or equipment for such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

27554.

Prior to the expenditure of any funds for the bus transit and water transportation system of the district, the board shall determine:

(a) The amount which the counties, and the transit districts therein, served by the system shall contribute to the operation of the system for benefits derived from intracounty operation connected with, or related to, the system. The method of computing and receiving such amount shall be the method provided for in the district’s Resolution No. 7030, adopted May 8, 1970.

(b) That the board of supervisors of these counties, and the transit districts therein, have made a commitment to contribute the amount specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

27555.

It is the intention of the Legislature that the district pursue all avenues to obtain federal financing for both its interim transit system and any long-range transportation facilities approved by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission. Furthermore, the district shall take no action which may preclude it from obtaining federal grants-in-aid if such grants are reasonably anticipated. Furthermore, the district shall encourage minority enterprise to the maximum extent practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

27556.

Except for the necessity to finance its interim system of buses and ferries, as described in Section 27551, or the necessity to finance capital improvements or modifications relating to seismic safety of the bridge, the district shall not issue general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, or any other form of long-term indebtedness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 166, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

27557.

The district may purchase transit equipment, such as cars, trolley buses and motorbuses, or rolling equipment, and may execute agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates in the forms customarily used by private corporations engaged in the transit business appropriate to effect the purchase and leasing of transit equipment, and may dispose of the equipment trust certificates on terms and conditions that the board may deem appropriate. Payment for the equipment, or rentals therefor, may be made in installments. The deferred installments may be evidenced by equipment trust certificates payable from any source of funds specified in the certificates that are or will be legally available to the district. Title to the equipment shall not vest in the district until the equipment trust certificates are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 50, Sec. 5.   Effective March 22, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

27558.

The agreement to purchase or lease may direct the vendor or lessor to sell and assign or lease the rolling equipment to a bank or trust company duly authorized to transact business in the state as trustee for the benefit and security of the equipment trust certificates, may direct the trustee to deliver the rolling equipment to one or more designated officers of the district, and may authorize the district to simultaneously therewith execute and deliver an installment purchase agreement or a lease of the equipment to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 50, Sec. 6.   Effective March 22, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

27559.

The agreements and leases shall be duly acknowledged before a person authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds and in the form required for acknowledgment of deeds. The agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall be authorized by resolution of the district and shall contain the covenants, conditions, restrictions, and provisions which may be deemed necessary or appropriate to insure the payment of the equipment trust certificates from legally available source of funds specified in the certificates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 50, Sec. 7.   Effective March 22, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

27560.

The covenants, conditions, restrictions, and provisions of the agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall not conflict with any of the provisions of any trust agreement securing the payment of bonds, notes, or certificates of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 50, Sec. 8.   Effective March 22, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

27561.

An executed copy of each agreement and lease shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, who may receive one dollar ($1) for each copy filed with the Secretary of State. The filing constitutes notice to any subsequent judgment creditor or any subsequent purchaser. Each vehicle so purchased or leased shall have the name of the owner or lessor plainly marked on both sides of the vehicle followed by the appropriate words “Owner and Lessor” or “Owner and Vendor,” as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 50, Sec. 9.   Effective March 22, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

27562.

Whenever the district offers for sale to the public coupons or commuter ticket books redeemable for the toll on the Golden Gate Bridge, the district shall make the coupons or commuter ticket books available at locations convenient to the public, which shall not be limited to toll bridge facilities, and by mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

27563.

Any person who, without the consent of the board of directors of the district, uses any district mark, name, word, or phrase, or combination, simulation, or colorable imitation thereof, which has or which may in the future be adopted by the district, including, but not limited to, the name “Golden Gate Bridge,” for the purpose of manufacturing, advertising, or selling equipment or merchandise, or for the purpose of advertising and selling services, or to promote any activity in which the district may engage, which use has a tendency to cause confusion, mistake, or deception with the district as to the origin of goods or services, or has a tendency to falsely represent or suggest an association or connection with the district or any district activity, shall be subject to a civil action by the district, for an injunction, and (1) defendant’s profits, (2) any damages sustained by the district, and (3) the costs of the action. In the court’s assessment of profits, the district shall be required to prove the defendant’s sales only, and the defendant shall prove all elements of costs or deduction claimed. In the court’s assessment of damages, the court may enter judgment according to the circumstances of the case, for any sum above the amount found as actual damages, not exceeding three times that amount. If the court shall find that the amount of the recovery based on profits is either inadequate or excessive, the court may, in its discretion, enter judgment for such sum as the court shall find to be just, according to the circumstances of the case, and may award reasonable attorneys’ fees to the prevailing party. Nothing in this section shall interfere with the vested rights of any person in any name, word, mark, symbol, or device.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 499, Sec. 1.   Effective July 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

27564.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Automatic vehicle identification systems when used for toll collection can speed up the flow of traffic at toll facilities and reduce collection costs.

(b) More than one system and technology is available.

(c) Currently, the department and the district operate toll bridges and other entities may soon operate toll roads or bridges.

(d) There are no permanent automatic vehicle identification systems for toll collection in the state at this time and none of the facility operators have selected a system or technology for future implementation.

(e) It is in the best interest of vehicle owners and operators that the automatic vehicle identification systems and technology used by all toll facility operators are compatible with one another.

(f) Compatible automatic vehicle identification systems can be selected for statewide use without requiring the purchase and installation from a single vendor or producer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1080, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

27565.

(a) The department, in cooperation with the district and all known entities planning to implement a toll facility in this state, shall develop and adopt functional specifications and standards for an automatic vehicle identification system, in compliance with all of the following objectives:

(1) In order to be detected, the driver shall not be required to reduce speed below the applicable speed for the type of facility being used.

(2) The vehicle owner shall not be required to purchase or install more than one device to use on all toll facilities, but may be required to have a separate
 account or financial arrangement for the use of these facilities.

(3) The facility operators shall have the ability to select from different manufacturers and vendors. The specifications and standards shall encourage multiple bidders, and shall not have the effect of limiting the facility operators to choosing a system that is able to be supplied by only one manufacturer or vendor.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any automatic vehicle identification system purchased or installed after January 1, 1991, shall comply with the specifications and standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply to an interim automatic vehicle identification system for which a contract is entered into between
 an entity planning to implement a toll facility and the supplier of the interim system prior to January 1, 1994, if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The department has made a written determination that the installation and operation of the interim system will expedite the completion of the toll facility and its opening to public use.

(2) The entity planning to implement the toll facility has entered into an agreement with the department to install, within five years after any portion of the toll facility is opened for public use, an automatic vehicle identification system meeting the specifications and standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) The automated vehicle identification system developed by the
 department pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be capable of identifying various types of vehicles, including, but not limited to, commercial vehicles.

(e) On and after the date specified in the federal Moving Ahead for Progress in the 21st Century Act for implementation of interoperability of electronic toll collection on federal-aid highways, operators of toll facilities on federal-aid highways may fully implement technologies or business
 practices that provide for the interoperability of electronic toll collection programs consistent with federal law. Operators of toll facilities on federal-aid highways engaged in an interoperability program may provide only the following information regarding a vehicle’s use of the toll facility, and shall otherwise comply with all federal and state privacy protection laws, including, but not limited to, Section 31490:

(1) License plate number.

(2) Transponder identification number.

(3) Date and time of transaction.

(4) Identity of the agency operating the toll facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 79, Sec. 2.   (AB 493)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

27566.

(a) In its role as administrator of the automatic vehicle identification system described in Section 27565, the Bay Area Toll Authority shall provide vehicle owners who seek to obtain an account the option of opening and maintaining an account with United States currency or check. That option shall also allow a customer to obtain an account without providing his or her name or address.

(b) The Bay Area Toll Authority shall inform the public about the option to obtain a cash-based account for the automatic vehicle identification system on its Internet Web site and in promotional materials.

(c) The Bay Area Toll Authority may provide a person with the option of making a payment with
 United States currency to replenish his or her vehicle identification system account at the toll plaza administration building associated with each of the state-owned toll bridges located within the geographic jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission.

(d) The Bay Area Toll Authority shall make a good faith effort to encourage commercial retailers that sell transponders for the automatic vehicle identification system to enable a person to replenish his or her account at the retail location with a variety of payment methods, including, but not limited to, United States currency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 515, Sec. 4.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

27567.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no toll shall be imposed on the passage of a pedestrian, a bicycle, or a personal micromobility device, as defined in Section 1940.41 of the Civil Code, over any bridge that is under the jurisdiction of the district, on which the travel of pedestrians, bicycles, or personal micromobility devices is otherwise authorized.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply if the bridge was under construction on or after
 January 1, 2025, and if the tolls are used to fund the cost of constructing the bridge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 731, Sec. 1.   (AB 2669)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 17. TOLL FACILITIES AND RELATED MATTERS [30000. - 31490.]



CHAPTER 1. The California Toll Bridge Authority Act [30000. - 30506.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [30000. - 30008.]

30000.

This chapter may be cited as the California Toll Bridge Authority Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30002.

Unless the particular provision or the context otherwise requires, the general provisions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30003.

“Commission” means the California Transportation Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 126.)
-------------------------------------------

30004.

“Toll bridge,” “bridge,” “subway,” “tunnel,” “tube,” and “highway crossing” include all appurtenances and additions, alterations or improvements thereto or replacements thereof, and the approaches to each end thereof, all lands and interest therein used therefor, and buildings and improvements thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1346.)
-------------------------------------------

30005.

“Transportation facilities” means all facilities for the transportation of passengers and property to and over any toll bridge, tube or other highway crossing and the approaches to each end thereof, acquired or constructed, to be acquired or constructed, or in course of construction pursuant to this chapter. “Transportation facilities” includes terminals, stations, viaducts, rails, tracks, power stations, substations and equipment and power supply lines, storage yards, and the real property, easements, and rights of way upon which any of them are located or situated or which are necessary therefor, and equipment, signals and interlockers, cars and rolling stock, and franchises, rights, and privileges appurtenant thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1346.)
-------------------------------------------

30006.

“Additional transportation facilities” means all facilities for the transportation of passengers and property connected or coordinated with or to be connected or coordinated with the transportation facilities of any toll bridge, tube or other toll highway crossing constructed or acquired, or to be constructed or acquired, or in the course of construction or acquisition pursuant to this chapter so as to provide a system of transportation for persons or property to and from that toll bridge or other toll highway crossing and the area within 50 miles from either end of that toll bridge or other toll highway crossing. “Additional transportation facilities” includes all of the personal and real properties, easements, rights of way, franchises, rights, and privileges which are included in “transportation facilities,” without limitation to the use thereof for the transportation of passengers and property to and over any toll bridge or other toll highway crossing, to the extent that the use thereof in connection or coordination with the transportation facilities of any toll bridge or other toll highway crossing provides a system of transportation for persons or property to and from that toll bridge or other highway crossing and the area within 50 miles from either end of that toll bridge or other toll highway crossing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1346.)
-------------------------------------------

30007.

“Bond” means any written evidence of indebtedness which the authority may issue pursuant to this chapter in order to secure funds with which to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30008.

Nothing in this chapter prevents the State from making appropriations from time to time in aid of the acquisition or construction pursuant to this chapter of any toll bridge, tube or other toll highway crossing, or property, franchises, or rights appurtenant thereto, or the transportation facilities thereof or thereto, or for the purpose of making preliminary surveys, plans, and estimates of the cost thereof, and meeting other preliminary expenses as the Legislature deems proper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1346.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. California Transportation Commission [30050. - 30050.]

30050.

(a) The California Toll Bridge Authority is hereby abolished, and the California Transportation Commission succeeds to, and is vested with, the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the California Toll Bridge Authority.

(b) Any reference in any law or regulation to the California Toll Bridge Authority shall be deemed to refer to the California Transportation Commission.

(c) The California Transportation Commission shall have the possession and control of all licenses, permits, leases, agreements, contracts, orders, claims, judgments, records, papers, equipment, supplies, bonds, moneys, funds, appropriations, buildings, land and other property, real or personal, held for the benefit, use, or obligation of the California Toll Bridge Authority.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1106.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Powers and Duties of the Commission [30100. - 30114.]

30100.

Whenever, in the opinion of the commission and of the department, it is necessary or desirable to do so, the commission shall authorize and direct the department to build or acquire for, and in the name of, the state any or all of the following:

(a) Toll bridges, tubes, or other toll highway crossings across water, bays, arms of bays, straits, rivers, and streams in California, both navigable and unnavigable, or across any stream that is a boundary line between California and any other state, or toll tunnels through mountains in California.

(b) Transportation facilities of any toll bridges or toll highway crossings constructed or acquired, or to be constructed or acquired, pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Additional transportation facilities connecting or coordinated with any such toll bridge or other highway crossing or the transportation facilities thereon.

The commission may authorize and direct the department to pay for any such construction or acquisition out of any funds provided or made available by this chapter. Whenever a project consists of a tube or tunnel which will accommodate traffic served by a privately owned ferry, the commission may acquire such ferry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

30100.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission may include, in any issue of revenue bonds, funds sufficient to finance the establishment of a ferry system as authorized by Section 30356, including the purchase or construction of ferry boats, wharves, docks, ferry slips, and other facilities necessary to the operation and maintenance of a ferry system. Upon determining that it is feasible to do so, the commission shall take all steps necessary to finance the establishment of ferry systems. Revenues derived from the operation of any ferry system shall be pledged as security for the payment of the bonds issued to finance the establishment of the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 129.)
-------------------------------------------

30100.5.

Notwithstanding Section 30100 or any other provision of law, no bridge or other highway crossing shall be constructed across San Francisco Bay by the commission, the department, or the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District, except to replace bridges or highway crossings on a one-for-one basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

30101.

Except as otherwise provided by statute for the commission and the Bay Area Toll Authority, the commission shall fix the rates of toll and other charges for all toll bridges, tubes, or other toll highway crossings acquired or built pursuant to this chapter. Notwithstanding this section or any other provision of law, neither the commission nor the Bay Area Toll Authority may change the seismic retrofit surcharge described in Section 31010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30101.5.

The commission may permit authorized emergency vehicles, as defined in Section 165 of the Vehicle Code, responding to or returning from mutual aid calls or other emergencies, and other vehicles owned by any public agency when called upon to perform emergency work on the property of any toll bridge, tube, or other toll highway crossing, to cross toll bridges, tubes, or other toll highway crossings without paying a toll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

30101.6.

The commission shall grant toll-free passage on all toll bridges, tubes, and other toll highway crossings under its jurisdiction to members of the California Highway Patrol on duty.

Members of the California Highway Patrol, in all cases while on duty, are persons directly connected with the operation of toll bridges, tubes, and other toll highway crossings as such persons are designated in all of the bond resolutions adopted by the commission to authorize the issuance of bonds to finance the construction of toll structures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 133.)
-------------------------------------------

30101.7.

(a) The commission shall grant toll free passage on all toll bridges, tubes, and other toll highway crossings under its jurisdiction to vehicles in a funeral procession of a person who died while on active duty with the armed services of the United States.

(b) The commission shall submit a claim for the loss in revenues resulting from subdivision (a) to the State Controller, who shall reimburse the commission in the amount submitted in the claim from funds appropriated by the Legislature to him for such purposes.

(c) The State Controller, in consultation with the commission, shall adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 134.)
-------------------------------------------

30101.8.

(a) The commission may grant toll-free and reduced-rate passage on all toll bridges under its jurisdiction to class I vehicles occupied by three or more persons, including the driver, and to buses. For bridges within the area under the jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, the Bay Area Toll Authority may grant toll-free and reduced-rate passage.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), tolls on the bridges shall be maintained at rates sufficient to meet any obligation to the holders of bonds secured by a pledge of bridge toll revenues, as set forth in any bond resolution, indenture, or covenants, and the commission shall revise or eliminate any toll-free or reduced-rate toll schedule adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) as necessary to ensure compliance with those obligations.

(c) If the commission grants toll-free and reduced-rate passage pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall also grant the same toll-free and reduced-rate passage to class I vehicles designed by the manufacturer to be occupied by no more than two persons, including the driver, if these vehicles are occupied by two persons, including the driver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30102.

Except as provided in Section 30102.5, the commission, in establishing toll charges, shall give consideration to the cost of operating and maintaining any particular toll bridge or other toll highway crossing, including the cost of insurance, the cost of operating and maintaining any ferry established and operated pursuant to Section 30356, and the amount required annually to meet the redemption of bonds and interest payments thereon. At all times, the tolls and charges shall be fixed at rates to yield annual revenue equal to the annual operating and maintenance expenses, including insurance costs, the cost of operating and maintaining any ferry established and operated pursuant to Section 30356, and all redemption payments and interest charges of the bonds issued for any particular toll bridge or other toll highway as they fall due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1182, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

30102.5.

Consistent with Section 30918, the Bay Area Toll Authority shall fix the rates of the toll charge, except as provided in Sections 30921 and 30923, and may grant reduced-rate and toll-free passage on the state-owned toll bridges within the jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 650, Sec. 4.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

30103.

Toll charges so fixed may be changed from time to time as conditions warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30104.

The commission shall prescribe the terms and conditions upon which any person, or private, public, or municipal corporation, or any district or political subdivision may do any of the following:

(a) Transport any person or property over any toll bridge or other toll highway crossing acquired or constructed, or to be acquired or constructed, or in course of construction pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Operate any transportation facilities thereon.
